Illinois, session 104th, HB2155.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. Legislative findings. 5    (a) The Bethalto Community Unit School District No. 8, 6Madison County, Illinois was the grantor of a quitclaim deed 7for nonprofit purposes as approved by the General Assembly in 8Public Act 90-71 to the Community Hope Center, Inc., in 9Madison County, Illinois and recorded on October 3, 1997, in 10Book 4171, Page 2127 in the Madison County Recorder's Office 11in which the District retained a reversionary interest. 12    (b) The deed restrictions contained in the quitclaim deed 13as established by the District and the General Assembly are no 14longer necessary or effective for the marketable use of the 15property, and it is in the best interest of the District and 16the constituents it serves that the property be free and clear 17of any and all restrictions set forth in the quitclaim deed and 18Public Act 90-71. 19    (c) The District, by resolution on April 24, 2025, 20released, withdrew, extinguished, and forgave all deed 21restrictions and reversionary rights and privileges present in 22the property that were not required or established by Public 23Act 90-71, including, but not limited to, the tax-exempt 24qualification requirement; the reversionary interest in the   HB2155 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11623 LNS 21712 b1event of abandonment, conveyance of any part or interest in 2the property without the District's written approval; and the 3District's written approval of any subsequent sale, 4conveyance, or other transfer of any or any part of the 5property or any interest therein. The resolution directed and 6authorized the Superintendent or designee to record a copy of 7the resolution with the Madison County Recorder's Office and 8execute any additional and necessary documents to effectuate 9that purpose. 10    Section 10. The legal description of the property in 11Public Act 90-71 and affected by this Act is as follows: 12        A tract of land in the Northwest Quarter of the 13    Northwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 5 North, Range 9 14    West of the Third Principal Meridian, in Madison County, 15    Illinois, described as follows: 16        Beginning at a point 277.33 feet South and 16 1/2 feet 17    East of the Northwest corner of said Section 2; thence 18    Easterly on a line parallel to the North line of said 19    Section 2, a distance of 431.8 feet to a point; thence 20    South on a line parallel to the West line of said Section 21    2, a distance of 1121.07 feet to a point on the South line 22    of the Northwest Quarter of said Section 2; thence 23    Westerly along said South line, a distance of 431.8 feet 24    to a point 16 1/2 feet East on the West line of said   HB2155 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11623 LNS 21712 b1    Section 2; thence North on a line parallel to the West line 2    of said Section 2, and 16 1/2 feet East thereof, a distance 3    of 1109.07 feet to the place of beginning. 4    also, 5        A strip of land 33.5 feet wide and 277.33 feet long in 6    the Northwest Quarter of the Northwest Quarter of Section 7    2, Township 5 North, Range 9 West of the Third Principal 8    Meridian, in Madison County, Illinois, more particularly 9    described as follows: 10        Beginning at a point on the North line of said Section 11    2, said point being 16.5 feet East of the Northwest corner 12    of said Section; thence South on a line parallel to the 13    West line of said Section 2, and 16 1/2 feet East thereof, 14    a distance of 277.33 feet to a point; thence East on a line 15    parallel to the North line of said Section 2, a distance of 16    33.5 feet to a point; thence North on a line parallel to 17    the West line of said Section 2, a distance of 277.33 feet 18    to a point on the North line of said Section; thence West 19    along the North line of said Section, a distance of 33.5 20    feet to the place of beginning. 21        Situated in the Township of Wood River, County of 22    Madison and State of Illinois.  23PPN: 19-1-08-02-00-000-003 24    Section 15. "An Act concerning the conveyance of school   HB2155 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11623 LNS 21712 b1property", approved July 8, 1997, Public Act 90-71, is amended 2by changing Section 7 as follows: 3    (P.A. 90-71, Sec. 7)4    Sec. 7. The secretary of the school board of Bethalto 5Community Unit School District No. 8, Madison County, Illinois 6shall prepare or cause to be prepared a quitclaim deed to 7release any and all interest in the real property and to 8release the covenant and condition previously recorded as a 9lien or other interest in or against the property. The 10secretary shall also record or cause to be recorded a 11certified copy of this Act. Each quitclaim deed shall 12reference this Act and the reversionary language being 13rescinded. All documents shall be recorded in Madison County, 14Illinois. The conveyance authorized by this Act is subject to 15the following covenant and condition, which shall run with the 16land and be set forth in the quitclaim deed conveying the above 17described real estate: In the event the grantee named in the 18deed enters into any lease of or sells, conveys, or otherwise 19transfers all or any part of the above described real estate or 20any interest therein to any other person, partnership, 21association, corporation, or other entity, Bethalto Community 22Unit School District No. 8, Madison County, Illinois shall 23thereupon be entitled to receive, and Community Hope Center, 24Inc. shall be required to pay over to Bethalto Community Unit 25School District No. 8, Madison County, Illinois all rentals   HB2155 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11623 LNS 21712 b1from time to time becoming due and payable under the terms of 2any such lease and all net proceeds resulting from any such 3sale, conveyance, or other transfer of all or any part of the 4above described real estate or any interest therein. 5(Source: P.A. 90-71, eff. 7-8-97.)